Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.310

Filing public records—Making information public for public interest.

All information, documents, and reports filed with the director under this chapter are matters of public record and shall be open to public inspection, subject to reasonable regulation. The director may make public, on a periodic or other basis, the information as may be necessary or appropriate in the public interest concerning the registration, reports, and information filed with the director or any other matters to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 237 s 26.]